public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A ar eràe/R [einoru]xar
SFX A ar eràe/R [einosu]car
SFX A ar eràe/R [eiu]xurar
SFX A ar eràe/R [eo]liđar
SFX A ar eràe/R [eo]ntiđar
SFX A ar eràe/R [es]kotar
SFX A ar eràe/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ar eràe/R [fjkx]ermar
SFX A ar eràe/R [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A ar eràe/R [fm]eretar
SFX A ar eràe/R [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A ar eràe/R [fŧ]etuar
SFX A ar eràe/R [gin]ritar
SFX A ar eràe/R [iln]trar
SFX A ar eràe/R [inru]jar
SFX A ar eràe/R [io]ntar
SFX A ar eràe/R [io]rkolar
SFX A ar eràe/R [ipt]ađar
SFX A ar eràe/R [ipu]lar
SFX A ar eràe/R [irst]umar
SFX A ar eràe/R [klt]ivar
SFX A ar eràe/R [kp]avejar
SFX A ar eràe/R [kt]erŧar
SFX A ar eràe/R [lmtxŧ]enŧiar
SFX A ar eràe/R [ln]etrar
SFX A ar eràe/R [lnoru]đar
SFX A ar eràe/R [mp]eritar
SFX A ar eràe/R [mv]ergolar
SFX A ar eràe/R [ns]erbar
SFX A ar eràe/R [ns]ervar
SFX A ar eràe/R [ns]kuercar
SFX A ar eràe/R [nsv]edar
SFX A ar eràe/R [nx]goŧar
SFX A ar eràe/R [op]ar
SFX A ar eràe/R [ox]longar
SFX A ar eràe/R [pt]resar
SFX A ar eràe/R [pt]rotar
SFX A ar eràe/R [stŧ]imentar
SFX A ar eràe/R [sŧ]erkar
SFX A ar eràe/R [tuv]iliđar
SFX A ar eràe/R [tv]eriđar
SFX A ar eràe/R [tv]erniđar
SFX A ar eràe/R [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ar eràe/R alar
SFX A ar eràe/R alienar
SFX A ar eràe/R amar
SFX A ar eràe/R arar
SFX A ar eràe/R bersajar
SFX A ar eràe/R bertonar
SFX A ar eràe/R bordeđar
SFX A ar eràe/R dar
SFX A ar eràe/R deramar
SFX A ar eràe/R derenar
SFX A ar eràe/R derivar
SFX A ar eràe/R derobar
SFX A ar eràe/R derokar
SFX A ar eràe/R derotar
SFX A ar eràe/R desferenŧiar
SFX A ar eràe/R devorar
SFX A ar eràe/R devorŧiar
SFX A ar eràe/R dexeredar
SFX A ar eràe/R dexverxenar
SFX A ar eràe/R donar
SFX A ar eràe/R exerŧitar
SFX A ar eràe/R far
SFX A ar eràe/R fermentar
SFX A ar eràe/R fumar
SFX A ar eràe/R griliar
SFX A ar eràe/R guernar
SFX A ar eràe/R inbaretar
SFX A ar eràe/R infervorar
SFX A ar eràe/R inkartonar
SFX A ar eràe/R intarsiar
SFX A ar eràe/R interesar
SFX A ar eràe/R interkalar
SFX A ar eràe/R interkuerar
SFX A ar eràe/R interkuirar
SFX A ar eràe/R interlinear
SFX A ar eràe/R intermeđar
SFX A ar eràe/R interogar
SFX A ar eràe/R interpretar
SFX A ar eràe/R inveriar
SFX A ar eràe/R inversiar
SFX A ar eràe/R inŧercelar
SFX A ar eràe/R kalar
SFX A ar eràe/R kalefar
SFX A ar eràe/R kantar
SFX A ar eràe/R kolar
SFX A ar eràe/R korniđar
SFX A ar eràe/R kriolar
SFX A ar eràe/R kurvar
SFX A ar eràe/R lotar
SFX A ar eràe/R lumar
SFX A ar eràe/R lustrar
SFX A ar eràe/R maravejar
SFX A ar eràe/R menar
SFX A ar eràe/R meravejar
SFX A ar eràe/R merkantar
SFX A ar eràe/R merkantiđar
SFX A ar eràe/R međar
SFX A ar eràe/R mojar
SFX A ar eràe/R mudarar
SFX A ar eràe/R ojar
SFX A ar eràe/R okar
SFX A ar eràe/R ormeđar
SFX A ar eràe/R perdonar
SFX A ar eràe/R perfumar
SFX A ar eràe/R perifraxar
SFX A ar eràe/R periodar
SFX A ar eràe/R perkolar
SFX A ar eràe/R perkotar
SFX A ar eràe/R perletar
SFX A ar eràe/R perlustrar
SFX A ar eràe/R permudarar
SFX A ar eràe/R permutar
SFX A ar eràe/R perorar
SFX A ar eràe/R perpetrar
SFX A ar eràe/R perpetuar
SFX A ar eràe/R perseguitar
SFX A ar eràe/R personaliđar
SFX A ar eràe/R persugar
SFX A ar eràe/R pertegar
SFX A ar eràe/R pongar
SFX A ar eràe/R rajar
SFX A ar eràe/R ramar
SFX A ar eràe/R raxar
SFX A ar eràe/R redar
SFX A ar eràe/R rigolar
SFX A ar eràe/R rivar
SFX A ar eràe/R robar
SFX A ar eràe/R roersar
SFX A ar eràe/R rolar
SFX A ar eràe/R sajar
SFX A ar eràe/R scantiđar
SFX A ar eràe/R seguitar
SFX A ar eràe/R serajar
SFX A ar eràe/R siar
SFX A ar eràe/R skortegar
SFX A ar eràe/R sotolinear
SFX A ar eràe/R soverkiar
SFX A ar eràe/R spergoŧar
SFX A ar eràe/R sperimentar
SFX A ar eràe/R sperlongar
SFX A ar eràe/R spernacar
SFX A ar eràe/R speronar
SFX A ar eràe/R sperđurar
SFX A ar eràe/R steriliđar
SFX A ar eràe/R sugar
SFX A ar eràe/R terapienar
SFX A ar eràe/R teraŧar
SFX A ar eràe/R termenar
SFX A ar eràe/R terminar
SFX A ar eràe/R terŧariolar
SFX A ar eràe/R tonar
SFX A ar eràe/R tormentar
SFX A ar eràe/R tuar
SFX A ar eràe/R vejar
SFX A ar eràe/R velar
SFX A ar eràe/R verdeđar
SFX A ar eràe/R vergiđar
SFX A ar eràe/R vergoñar
SFX A ar eràe/R verifegar
SFX A ar eràe/R verigolar
SFX A ar eràe/R verolar
SFX A ar eràe/R versar
SFX A ar eràe/R verxurar
SFX A ar eràe/R verđelar
SFX A ar eràe/R xberlefar
SFX A ar eràe/R xberlotar
SFX A ar eràe/R xberlumar
SFX A ar eràe/R xberxelar
SFX A ar eràe/R xelar
SFX A ar eràe/R xermojar
SFX A ar eràe/R xgoñar
SFX A ar eràe/R xlargiđar
SFX A ar eràe/R xmerdar
SFX A ar eràe/R xmerejar
SFX A ar eràe/R xmeriliar
SFX A ar eràe/R xmerŧiar
SFX A ar eràe/R xmorgolar
SFX A ar eràe/R xnervađar
SFX A ar eràe/R xvergoñaŧar
SFX A ar eràe/R đurar
SFX A ar eràe/R ŧercar
SFX A ar eràe/R ŧitar
SFX A ar erè/J [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A ar erè/J [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A ar erè/J [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A ar erè/J [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A ar erè/J [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar erè/J [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A ar erè/J [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A ar erè/J [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A ar erè/J [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A ar erè/J [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A ar erè/J [abfgptu]regar
SFX A ar erè/J [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A ar erè/J [abfkx]renar
SFX A ar erè/J [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar erè/J [abik]rokar
SFX A ar erè/J [abikoptu]riar
SFX A ar erè/J [adiopt]ronar
SFX A ar erè/J [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A ar erè/J [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A ar erè/J [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A ar erè/J [aeio]strar
SFX A ar erè/J [aeiop]letar
SFX A ar erè/J [aeiou]xenar
SFX A ar erè/J [aeiru]ñar
SFX A ar erè/J [aeiu]ngar
SFX A ar erè/J [aeiu]ŧiar
SFX A ar erè/J [aelo]var
SFX A ar erè/J [aenoux]golar
SFX A ar erè/J [aeo]liar
SFX A ar erè/J [aeors]tiđar
SFX A ar erè/J [aeou]mentar
SFX A ar erè/J [agot]rejar
SFX A ar erè/J [ai]erar
SFX A ar erè/J [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A ar erè/J [ail]gar
SFX A ar erè/J [ailnou]sar
SFX A ar erè/J [ailnu]bar
SFX A ar erè/J [ailu]minar
SFX A ar erè/J [aiou]rmar
SFX A ar erè/J [aisu]kiar
SFX A ar erè/J [aku]rifegar
SFX A ar erè/J [als]tar
SFX A ar erè/J [an]deđar
SFX A ar erè/J [an]fraxar
SFX A ar erè/J [an]kuerar
SFX A ar erè/J [an]kuirar
SFX A ar erè/J [ano]fegar
SFX A ar erè/J [ao]niđar
SFX A ar erè/J [ao]rcar
SFX A ar erè/J [ao]rdar
SFX A ar erè/J [ao]rdonar
SFX A ar erè/J [ao]rkar
SFX A ar erè/J [ao]rnar
SFX A ar erè/J [ao]rsar
SFX A ar erè/J [aou]nŧiar
SFX A ar erè/J [aou]rbar
SFX A ar erè/J [aou]rgar
SFX A ar erè/J [aou]rkiar
SFX A ar erè/J [aou]rlar
SFX A ar erè/J [aou]rtar
SFX A ar erè/J [aou]rŧar
SFX A ar erè/J [ar]naliđar
SFX A ar erè/J [aux]nar
SFX A ar erè/J [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A ar erè/J [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A ar erè/J [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A ar erè/J [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A ar erè/J [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A ar erè/J [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A ar erè/J [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A ar erè/J [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A ar erè/J [bdfmnptvx]iar
SFX A ar erè/J [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A ar erè/J [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A ar erè/J [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A ar erè/J [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A ar erè/J [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A ar erè/J [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A ar erè/J [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A ar erè/J [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A ar erè/J [blprsvx]ear
SFX A ar erè/J [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A ar erè/J [bmtŧ]iliar
SFX A ar erè/J [bou]rogar
SFX A ar erè/J [bp]erlar
SFX A ar erè/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ar erè/J [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A ar erè/J [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A ar erè/J [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A ar erè/J [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A ar erè/J [dg]obar
SFX A ar erè/J [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A ar erè/J [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A ar erè/J [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A ar erè/J [dltv]ernar
SFX A ar erè/J [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A ar erè/J [eilox]mar
SFX A ar erè/J [einoru]xar
SFX A ar erè/J [einosu]car
SFX A ar erè/J [eiu]xurar
SFX A ar erè/J [eo]liđar
SFX A ar erè/J [eo]ntiđar
SFX A ar erè/J [es]kotar
SFX A ar erè/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ar erè/J [fjkx]ermar
SFX A ar erè/J [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A ar erè/J [fm]eretar
SFX A ar erè/J [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A ar erè/J [fŧ]etuar
SFX A ar erè/J [gin]ritar
SFX A ar erè/J [iln]trar
SFX A ar erè/J [inru]jar
SFX A ar erè/J [io]ntar
SFX A ar erè/J [io]rkolar
SFX A ar erè/J [ipt]ađar
SFX A ar erè/J [ipu]lar
SFX A ar erè/J [irst]umar
SFX A ar erè/J [klt]ivar
