public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.dic
afanar/A
albergar/A
alear/A
realŧar/A
andar/A
angaređar/A
arbitrar/A
arenar/A
inarpeđar/A
asiar/A
atribuir/A
augurar/A
reaver/A
inaxolar/A
xbafarar/A
xbajar/A
baketar/A
xbalar/A
xbaliđar/A
balotar/A
strabalŧar/A
bandiđar/A
xbanpir/A
barakar/A
inbarbaɉar/A
dexbarkar/A
xbarufar/A
inbastir/A
dexbateđar/A
baŧilar/A
inbautar/A
baxar/A
xbefeɉar/A
begar/A
xberlar/A
inbestialir/A
xbevaciar/A
xbiankar/A
biaxemar/A
xbimar/A
bindolar/A
birbantar/A
bitar/A
xbixigolar/A
rebójer/A
reboɉir/A
xbokar/A
rebolar/A
xbolsegar/A
abonbar/A
sorabondar/A
bordar/A
xborfar/A
inboskar/A
botiđar/A
inboŧar/A
brakiđar/A
xbragesar/A
bramiđar/A
xbrasar/A
inbraŧolar/A
brevetar/A
brikonar/A
xbroacar/A
broɉar/A
xbroketar/A
xbronkolar/A
brunir/A
xbruxar/A
bufonar/A
buskar/A
rebutar/A
inbuxerar/A
camar/A
carir/A
descavar/A
incénder/A
intracèñer/A
acéñer/A
recéñer/A
cetarar/A
cinconar/A
scoketar/A
dir/A
redar/A
daneđar/A
prodegar/A
dentelar/A
destreɉar/A
dexeñar/A
xdindolar/A
dixdíxer/A
indoar/A
indolentrar/A
domandar/A
pardonar/A
indopionar/A
dormikiar/A
dotorar/A
driŧar/A
indurir/A
sedúxer/A
đavaɉar/A
đogolar/A
rađónxer/A
đugatolar/A
èrđer/A
ekuivokar/A
esir/A
exebir/A
likuefar/A
sfadigar/A
sfalsar/A
farfuñar/A
infaŧendar/A
mañifegar/A
infeltronar/A
desferar/A
festiđar/A
desfiamar/A
desfibrar/A
desfikar/A
skonfinar/A
fioŧinar/A
inafitar/A
fogar/A
foleđar/A
forfar/A
desfornar/A
infradelar/A
sfrànđer/A
fraudar/A
refreskar/A
infrolir/A
infugar/A
sfumegar/A
gabar/A
dexgalonar/A
xgangolir/A
ingarbuɉar/A
ingavar/A
glutinar/A
gorar/A
gradelar/A
xgranelar/A
graŧiar/A
ingrejar/A
grintar/A
xgrixolir/A
gruñir/A
xguaratar/A
gucar/A
regurxitar/A
imaxinar/A
ingaxar/A
inproviđar/A
intrar/A
reiterar/A
xɉaŧar/A
ɉostrar/A
skaciđar/A
kajar/A
kalkañar/A
kalŧinar/A
skanalar/A
inkankrenir/A
deskantonar/A
dekapitar/A
karamelar/A
deskarnar/A
skartar/A
skasegar/A
skataronar/A
inkaŧir/A
kavalkar/A
inkinar/A
arkòjer/A
inkolar/A
inkoltrinar/A
deskonir/A
skonkuasar/A
konseliar/A
kontrolar/A
akorar/A
akordar/A
skornar/A
kospetonar/A
deskovèrđer/A
kréser/A
skrokar/A
krovar/A
skuartar/A
kufar/A
kulatar/A
skurioxar/A
lamentar/A
xlapar/A
xlatinar/A
ledrar/A
leskar/A
xlexierir/A
likuidar/A
lisiar/A
xlonbar/A
prelúder/A
relúxer/A
xmagonar/A
xmalŧar/A
manganar/A
mañetiđar/A
marinar/A
maselar/A
xmatar/A
inmaxarir/A
mejorar/A
inmenestrar/A
remeritar/A
ométer/A
mijorar/A
dexmisiar/A
xmokaɉar/A
xmonar/A
premorir/A
moroxar/A
moteđar/A
mudarar/A
dexmurar/A
inmutriar/A
anaspar/A
xnegriđar/A
nobilir/A
nòxer/A
xñarar/A
ofiŧiar/A
onbrar/A
operar/A
inorkar/A
ospitar/A
pair/A
inpakar/A
spaliŧar/A
pandar/A
papolar/A
skonparir/A
repartir/A
trapasar/A
patir/A
paŧientar/A
peđorar/A
spelakiar/A
dispénder/A
despensar/A
deperir/A
pertegar/A
peteđolar/A
speŧegar/A
strapiantar/A
repiegar/A
pinŧar/A
inpirar/A
piturar/A
replegar/A
polsar/A
deskonpóner/A
inponarar/A
despontelar/A
porkeđar/A
apostar/A
povolar/A
presostatar/A
dexinprimar/A
provar/A
spupilar/A
inrabir/A
inraixar/A
rankurar/A
raspar/A
reditar/A
renunŧiar/A
ridakiar/A
derivar/A
interogar/A
ronfar/A
rostelar/A
rufianar/A
inruvidir/A
insakar/A
saleđar/A
sanar/A
sasar/A
scanxar/A
sekir/A
proseguir/A
seɉar/A
senbrar/A
aseñar/A
aservir/A
sfisiar/A
desiɉilar/A
siringar/A
skalinar/A
inskarpiar/A
skenar/A
skoltar/A
skríver/A
sodar/A
soleŧitar/A
sonetar/A
sortir/A
sparpajar/A
desperar/A
spicar/A
sospirar/A
spoxar/A
restar/A
starnudir/A
staxonar/A
stiletar/A
stivar/A
istradar/A
astrénđer/A
stropar/A
istuar/A
suàder/A
susultar/A
susurar/A
destaɉar/A
tamusar/A
taponar/A
tartaɉar/A
intaxar/A
preténder/A
tenpoređar/A
reténxer/A
astèñer/A
kontéñer/A
desterminar/A
texorar/A
tironar/A
tonar/A
intopar/A
stortar/A
intovaɉar/A
tràder/A
strapar/A
travar/A
tresar/A
trinkar/A
troñar/A
desturbar/A
ŧapolar/A
ŧenar/A
ŧernir/A
inŧíder/A
reŧiñar/A
ŧolar/A
ultimar/A
maluxar/A
invalidar/A
soravanŧar/A
véder/A
velar/A	po:verb
deventar/A
interveñir/A
intervèñer/A
vergar/A
intraversar/A
vestir/A
xviar/A
konvínŧer/A
konvíver/A
avokar/A
revoltar/A
devorar/A
xautar/A
xdrumar/A
xetar/A
xlauranar/A
xovar/A
